Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1943.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7501 of Title 36, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


No insurer in this state shall reduce the amount of payment for


anesthesia services solely due to the participation of a Certified


Registered Nurse Anesthetist (CRNA) in anesthesia services.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2483 CAD 1/15/2026 9:04:04 AM









Req. No. 2483 Page 1